Hawaii statutes.
§602-52 Salary. Effective July 1,
2004, the salary of the chief judge of the intermediate appellate court and the
salary of each associate judge shall be as last recommended by the judicial
salary commission. Effective July 1, 2007, and every six years thereafter, the
salary of the chief judge of the intermediate appellate court and the salary of
each associate judge shall be as last recommended by the commission on salaries
pursuant to section 26‑56, unless disapproved by the legislature. [L
1979, c 111, pt of §3; am L 1982, c 129, §25(2); am L 1986, c 128, §23; am L
1990, c 72, §4; am L 1999, c 65, §5; am L 2000, c 2, §3; am L 2003, c 123, §3;
am L 2006, c 299, §8]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next